Nevada, session 83, SB123.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 244 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
A board of county commissioners shall not enact any
ordinance or measure that imposes rent control.
-
*SB123*

– 2 –
Sec. 2. Chapter 268 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The governing body of an incorporated city shall not enact any
ordinance or measure that imposes rent control.
H
-
*SB123*